src/fst/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
!! Pronoun inflection

!! The Moksha language pronouns inflect in the same cases as regular
!! nouns, but ...

!!!!!!!!!!!
!! PRONOUNS 
!!!!!!!!!!!

!end
LEXICON PERS                        !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
мон+Pron+Pers+Sg1:мон PERS-SG1 ;    !!≈ * **@CODE@** ...
тон+Pron+Pers+Sg2:тон PERS-SG2 ; 
сон+Pron+Pers+Sg3:сон PERS-SG3 ;
мон+Pron+Pers+Pl1:мин PERS-PL1 ;
тон+Pron+Pers+Pl2:тин PERS-PL2 ; 
сон+Pron+Pers+Pl3:син PERS-PL3 ;

мон+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dat+Short:тейне K/DAT-ARAM ;
мон+Use/NG+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dat+Short:теене K/DAT-ARAM ;
мон+Use/NG+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dat+Short:теень K/DAT-ARAM ;
мон+Use/NG+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dat+Short:тейнь K/DAT-ARAM ;
мон+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Dat+Short:тейнек K/DAT-ARAM ;
мон+Use/NG+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Dat+Short:теенек K/DAT-ARAM ;
мон+Use/NG+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Dat+Short:тееньк K/DAT-ARAM ;
тон+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dat+Short:тейть K/DAT-ARAM ;
тон+Use/NG+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dat+Short:тееть K/DAT-ARAM ;
тон+Use/NG+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dat+Short:теть K/DAT-ARAM ;
тон+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Dat+Short:тейнть K/DAT-ARAM ;
тон+Use/NG+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Dat+Short:теенть K/DAT-ARAM ;
сон+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Dat+Short:тейнз%{АО%} K/DAT-ARAM ;
сон+Use/NG+v2+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Dat+Short:теенз%{АО%} K/DAT-ARAM ;
сон+v1+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Dat+Short:тейст K/DAT-ARAM ;
сон+Use/NG+v2+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Dat+Short:теест K/DAT-ARAM ;


LEXICON PRON_
: #;
LEXICON PRON_AVA
NMN_AVA ;


!! PERSONAL PRONOUNS
LEXICON PERS-SG1
!мон:мон
+Nom: K_ГА ;
+Nom+Clt/Cop+Prs: VERB-ZERO-10 ;
+Nom+Clt/Cop: MUTUAL-PRT2-10 ;
+Gen:ь K_ГА ;
+Dat+Long:дейне K/DAT-ARAM ;
+Dat+Long+Use/NG:дине K/DAT-ARAM ;
+Dat+Long+Use/NG:дейнь K/DAT-ARAM ;
+Dat+Long+Use/NG:деень K/DAT-ARAM ;
+Abl:дедон K ;
+Abe:ьфтемон K ;
+Ine:ьцон K ;
+Ela:ьцтон K ;
!+Intensive+Nom:ць K_ГА ;
!+Intensive+Gen:цень K_ГА ;
!+Intensive+Gen+Der+Der/Poss:ценне DERPOSS-NUM-CASE ;
+Gen+Der+Der/Poss+N:не DERPOSS-NUM-CASE ;

LEXICON PERS-SG2
! тон:тон
+Nom: K_ГА ;
+Nom+Clt/Cop+Prs: VERB-ZERO-20 ;
+Nom+Clt/Cop: MUTUAL-PRT2-20 ;
+Gen:ь K_ГА ;
+Dat+Long:дейть K_ГА/DAT-ARAM ;
+Dat+Long+Use/NG:дееть K_ГА/DAT-ARAM ;
+Abl:дедот K_ГА ;
+Abe:ьфтемот K_ГА ;
+Ine:ьцот K_ГА ;
+Ela:ьцтот K_ГА ;
+Intensive+Nom:ць K_ГА ;
+Intensive+Gen:цень K_ГА ;
+Intensive+Gen+Der+Der/Poss:ценне DERPOSS-NUM-CASE ;
+Gen+Der+Der/Poss+N:не DERPOSS-NUM-CASE ;

LEXICON PERS-SG3
! сон:сон
+Nom: K_ГА ;
+Nom+Clt/Cop: MUTUAL-PRT2-30 ;
+Gen:ь K_ГА ;
+Dat+Long:дейнз%{АО%} K/DAT-ARAM ;
+Dat+Long+Use/NG:деенз%{АО%} K/DAT-ARAM ;
+Abl:дедонз%{АО%} K_вок ;
+Abe:ьфтемонз%{АО%} K_вок ;
+Ine:ьцонз%{АО%} K_вок ;
+Ela:ьцтонз%{АО%} K_вок ;
+Intensive+Nom:ць K_ГА ;
+Intensive+Gen:цень K_ГА ;
+Intensive+Gen+Der+Der/Poss+Pron:ценне  DERPOSS-NUM-CASE ;
+Gen+Der+Der/Poss+Pron:не DERPOSS-NUM-CASE ;

LEXICON PERS-PL1
!минь:мин
+Nom:ь K_ГА ;
+Nom+Clt/Cop+Prs:ь VERB-ZERO-40 ;
+Nom+Clt/Cop:ь MUTUAL-PRT2-40 ;
+Gen:ь K_ГА ;
+Abl+Use/NG:дедонк K_овок ;
+Abl:ьдонк K_овок ;
+Abe:ьфтомонк K ;
+Ine:ьцонк K ;
+Ela:ьцтонк K ;
+Use/NG+Dat+Long:дейнек K_ГА/DAT-ARAM ;
+Use/NG+Dat+Long:дееньк K_ГА/DAT-ARAM ;
+Dat+Long:деенек K_ГА/DAT-ARAM ;
+Abl:дедонк K_овок ;
+Ine:ьцонк K_овок ;
+Intensive+Nom:ць K_ГА ;
+Intensive+Gen:цень K_ГА ;
+Intensive+Gen+Der+Der/Poss:ценне  DERPOSS-NUM-CASE ;
+Gen+Der+Der/Poss+N:не DERPOSS-NUM-CASE ;

LEXICON PERS-PL2
!тинь:тин
+Nom:ь K_ГА ;
+Nom+Clt/Cop+Prs:ь VERB-ZERO-50 ;
+Nom+Clt/Cop:ь MUTUAL-PRT2-50 ;
+Use/NG+Dat+Long:дейнть K_ГА/DAT-ARAM ;
+Dat+Long:деенть K_ГА/DAT-ARAM ;
+Gen:ь K_ГА ;
+Abl+Use/NG:дедонт K_овок ;
+Abl:ьдонт K_овок ;
+Abe:ьфтомонт K ;
+Ine:ьцонт K ;
+Ela:ьцтонт K ;
+Intensive+Nom:ць K_ГА ;
+Intensive+Gen:цень K_ГА ;
+Intensive+Gen+Der+Der/Poss:ценне  DERPOSS-NUM-CASE ;
+Gen+Der+Der/Poss+N:не DERPOSS-NUM-CASE ;

LEXICON PERS-PL3
!!синь:син
+Nom:ь K_ГА ;
+Nom+Clt/Cop:ь MUTUAL-PRT2-60 ;
+Dat+Long:деест K_ГА/DAT-ARAM ;
+Use/NG+Dat+Long:дейст K_ГА/DAT-ARAM ;
+Gen:ь K_ГА ;
+Abl:дедост K_ГА ;
+Abl:ьдост K_овок ;
+Abe:ьфтомост K ;
+Abe+Use/NG:ьфтемост K ;
+Ine:ьцост K ;
+Ela:ьцтост K ;
+Intensive+Nom:ць K_ГА ;
+Intensive+Gen:цень K_ГА ;
+Intensive+Gen+Der+Der/Poss:ценне  DERPOSS-NUM-CASE ;
+Gen+Der+Der/Poss+N:не DERPOSS-NUM-CASE ;
!!

LEXICON REFL
монць+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Abe+Long:монцфтомон K ;
монць+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Abe+Long:минцфтомонк K ;
тонць+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Abe+Long:тонцфтомот K ;
тонць+Pron+Refl+Pl2+Abe+Long:тинцфтомонт K ;
сонць+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Abe+Long:сонцфтомонз%{АО%} K ;
сонць+Pron+Refl+Pl3+Abe+Long:синцфтомост K ;

монць+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Dat+Long:монцтейне K/DAT-ARAM ;
монць+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Dat+Long:минцтеенек K/DAT-ARAM ;
монць+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Dat+Long:минцтейнек K/DAT-ARAM ;
тонць+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Dat+Long:тонцтейть K/DAT-ARAM ;
тонць+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Dat+Long:тонцтееть K/DAT-ARAM ;
тонць+Pron+Refl+Pl2+Dat+Long:тинцтейнть K/DAT-ARAM ;
тонць+Pron+Refl+Pl2+Dat+Long:тинцтеенть K/DAT-ARAM ;
сонць+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Dat+Long:сонцтейнз%{АО%} K/DAT-ARAM ;
сонць+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Dat+Long:сонцтеенз%{АО%} K/DAT-ARAM ;
сонць+Pron+Refl+Pl3+Dat+Long:синцтейст K/DAT-ARAM ;
сонць+Pron+Refl+Pl3+Dat+Long:синцтеест K/DAT-ARAM ;


монць+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Ill+Short:эсезон K ;
монць+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Ill+Short:эсезонк K ;
тонць+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Ill+Short:эсезот K ;
тонць+Pron+Refl+Pl2+Ill+Short:эсезонт K ;
сонць+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Ill+Short:эсезонза K ;
сонць+Pron+Refl+Pl3+Ill+Short:эсезост K ;

монць+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Dat+Short:эстейне K/DAT-ARAM ;
монць+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Dat+Short+Use/NG:эстеень K/DAT-ARAM ;
монць+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Dat+Short:эстеенек K/DAT-ARAM ;
монць+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Dat+Short:эстейнек K/DAT-ARAM ;
монць+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Dat+Short+Use/NG:эстееньк K/DAT-ARAM ;
тонць+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Dat+Short:эстейть K/DAT-ARAM ;
тонць+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Dat+Short:эстееть K/DAT-ARAM ;
тонць+Pron+Refl+Pl2+Dat+Short:эстейнть K/DAT-ARAM ;
тонць+Pron+Refl+Pl2+Dat+Short:эстеенть K/DAT-ARAM ;
сонць+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Dat+Short:эстеенз%{АО%} K/DAT-ARAM ;
сонць+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Dat+Short:эстейнз%{АО%} K/DAT-ARAM ;
сонць+Pron+Refl+Pl3+Dat+Short:эстейст K/DAT-ARAM ;
сонць+Pron+Refl+Pl3+Dat+Short:эстеест K/DAT-ARAM ;

монць+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Gen+Long:монце GEN-FORM_OR_POSS ;
монць+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Gen+Long:минце GEN-FORM_OR_POSS ;
тонць+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Gen+Long:тонце GEN-FORM_OR_POSS ;
тонць+Pron+Refl+Pl2+Gen+Long:тинце GEN-FORM_OR_POSS ;
сонць+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Gen+Long:сонце GEN-FORM_OR_POSS ;
сонць+Pron+Refl+Pl3+Gen+Long:синце GEN-FORM_OR_POSS ;

!монць+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Gen+Short:эсень GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
!монць+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Gen+Short:эсенек GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
!тонць+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Gen+Short:эсеть GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
!тонць+Pron+Refl+Pl2+Gen+Short:эсенк GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
!сонць+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Gen+Short:эсонза GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;
!сонць+Pron+Refl+Pl3+Gen+Short:эсест GEN-FORM-REFL-PRON_MWN-CONTINUATION_OR-NOT ;

монць+Pron+Refl+Sg1+Nom:монць K ;
монць+Pron+Refl+Pl1+Nom:минць K ;
тонць+Pron+Refl+Sg2+Nom:тонць K ;
тонць+Pron+Refl+Pl2+Nom:тынць K ;
сонць+Pron+Refl+Sg3+Nom:сонць K ;
сонць+Pron+Refl+Pl3+Nom:сынць K ;


LEXICON GEN-FORM_OR_POSS
:нь K ;
+Der+Der/Poss+N:нне DERPOSS-NUM-CASE ;
! тонне forms



!! ### DEMONSTRATIVE PRONOUNS
LEXICON PRON-DEM_
+Dem: PRON-DEM-SG ;
LEXICON PRON-DEM_SIA
 PRON-DEM_NIAT ;
+Sg+Abl+Indef:%>д%{АО%} K ;
+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>%{ЕОØ%}нди K/DAT-ARAM ;
+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>%{ЕОØ%}нь K ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef: K ;
+Sg+Gen+Der+Der/Poss+Pron:%>%{ЕОØ%}нне DERPOSS-NUM-CASE ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM_NIAT !нят:ня
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>т K ;
+Pl+Dat+Def:%>т%>не%>нди K/DAT-ARAM ;
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>т%>не%>нь K ;
+Pl+Nom+Def:%>т%>не K ;


LEXICON PRON-DEM-SG
+Sg+Abl+Indef:%>д%{АО%} K_вок ;
+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>%{ЕОØ%}нди K_вок ;
+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>%{ЕОØ%}нь K_ГА ;
+Sg+Nom+Indef: K_вок ;
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>тЬ2 K_ГА ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM_TONA
PRON-DEM_ ;
+Dem+Sg+Dat+PxSg3:%>%{ЕОØ%}нц%>ты K_вок ;
+Dem+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:%>%{ЕОØ%}нц K ;
+Dem+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:%>%{ЕОØ%}ц K ;

LEXICON PRONOUN-TYPES
ашяйкова+Pron:ашяйкова PRON_  "(ei) mitään" ;
ашяйковок+Pron:ашяйковок PRON_  "(ei) mitään" ;
гайсна+Pron:гайсна PRON_  "tuo" ;
гайся+Pron:гайся PRON_  "se" ;
кигава+Pron:кигава PRON_  "" ;
кигок+Pron:кигок PRON_  "" ;
киньге+Pron:киньге PRON_  "" ;
конашка+Pron:конашка PRON_  "minkä kokoinen" ;
ладнек+Adv:ладнек PRON_  "koko, kokonaan, täysin" ;
меяма+Pron:меяма PRON_  "" ;
мийеге+Pron:мийеге PRON_  "" ;
миявок+Pron:миявок PRON_  "" ;
миярс+Pron:миярс PRON_  "" ;
миятка+Pron:миятка PRON_  "" ;
мяйя+Pron:мяйя PRON_  "" ;
нява+Pron:нява PRON_  "tuolla" ;
ома+Pron:ома PRON_  "" ;
стамка+Pron:стамка PRON_  "" ;
сювакай+Pron:сювакай PRON_  "" ;
нона+Pron:нона PRON_  "muu, toinen, edellinen" ;
нят+Pron+Dem:ня PRON-DEM_NIAT  "nämä, ne" ;
някот+Pron:няк%{АО%} PRON-DEM_NIAT  "(mon.) vain nämä" ;
ся+Pron+Dem:ся PRON-DEM_SIA  "se" ;
тона+Pron:тона PRON-DEM_TONA  "tuo, se" ;
тя+Pron:тя PRON-DEM_  "tämä, se; (mon.) nämä, ne" ;
тяшка+A+Dem:тяшка PRON_AVA  "sellainen, semmoinen, samanlainen" ;
финцне+Pron:финцне PRON_  "jotkut" ;
фкя-фкада+Pron:фкя-фкада PRON_  "" ;
фкя-фкянь+Pron:фкя-фкянь PRON_  "" ;
эковай+Pron:эковай PRON_  "" ;
